Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RIGHT TRACK YOUTH INTERNSHIPS.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Paul to expand the city's Right Track youth internship program. The Right Track program connects young people from cost-burdened households to internships that develop work readiness skills and provide opportunities for mentorship and exploring career pathways. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end